District of Columbia statutes.
20-521

Restraining acts of personal representatives.

(a)

On the petition of any interested person, the Court by temporary order and for good cause shown may restrain a supervised personal representative from performing specified acts of administration, disbursement, or distribution, or exercising any powers or discharging any duties of such office, or make any other order to secure proper performance of the supervised personal representative’s duty, if it appears to the Court that the supervised personal representative otherwise may take some action which would unreasonably jeopardize the interest of the petitioner. Persons with whom the supervised personal representative may transact business may be made parties.

(b)

The matter shall be set for hearing within 10 days unless the parties otherwise agree. Notice as the Court directs shall be given to the supervised personal representative and his attorney of record, if any, and to any other parties named defendant in the petition.

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-241, § 3(aa), 42 DCR 63
Application of Law 10-241: See Application of Law 10-241 and Emergency act amendment notes to § 20-501.
1981 Ed., § 20-521.
Estate administration, accountings required, see § 20-724.